print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.polish.tex
  .we3c2                        .we3l2                        .we4s3tch2      
  .wech2                        .we3@l2                       .wesz2   
  .wecz2                        .we3m2                        .we3@s2  
  .we3@c2                       .wemk2                        .we3t2   
  .we3d2                        .we3n2                        .wetk2   
  .wedz2                        .we3@n2                       .we3w2   
  .wed@z2                       .we3p2                        .we3z2   
  .wed@r2                       .wepch2                       .we4z3br
  .we3f2                        .we3r2                        .we4z3g@l
  .we3g2                        .werz2                        .we3@z2  
  .we3h2                        .we3s2                        .we3@r2  
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI: WY- , NIEWY-
%
  .wy3b2      .niewy3b2                        .wymk2   
  .wybr2                                       .wy3n2      .niewy3n2     
  .wybrz2                                      .wy3@n2     .niewy3@n2    
  .wy3c2      .niewy3c2                        .wy3p2      .niewy3p2     
  .wych2      .niewych2                        .wypch2  
  .wycz2      .niewycz2                        .wyprz2
  .wy3@c2     .niewy3@c2                       .wy3r2      .niewy3r2     
  .wy3d2      .niewy3d2                        .wyrz2      .niewyrz2     
  .wydr2                                       .wyr@r2  
  .wydz2      .niewydz2                        .wy3s2      .niewy3s2     
  .wyd@z2     .niewyd@z2                       .wysm2   
  .wyd@r2     .niewyd@r2                       .wysz2      .niewysz2     
  .wy3f2      .niewy3f2                        .wy3@s2     .niewy3@s2    
  .wy3g2      .niewy3g2                        .wy3t2      .niewy3t2     
  .wygrz2                                      .wytch2     
  .wy3h2      .niewy3h2                        .wytk2      .niewytk2
  .wy3k2      .niewy3k2                        .wytr2      .niewytr2
  .wykl2                                       .wy3w2      .niewy3w2    
  .wykr2                                       .wy3z2      .niewy3z2
  .wy3l2      .niewy3l2                        .wy3@z2     .niewy3@z2
  .wy3@l2     .niewy3@l2                       .wy3@r2     .niewy3@r2
  .wy3m2      .niewy3m2     
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI: ZA-
%
  .za3b2                        .zagrz2                       .zarz2
  .zabr2                        .za3h2                        .zar@r2
  .zabrz2                       .za3k2                        .za3s2
  .za3c2                        .zakl2                        .zasm2
  .zach2                        .zakr2                        .zasz2
  .zacz2                        .zakrz2                       .za3@s2
  .za3@c2                       .za3l2                        .za3t2
  .za3d2                        .za3@l2                       .zatk2
  .zadr2                        .za3m2                        .zatr2
  .zadz2                        .zamk2                        .za3w2
  .zad@z2                       .za3n2                        .za3z2
  .zad@r2                       .za3@n2                       .za3@z2
  .za3f2                        .za3p2                        .za3@r2
  .za3g2                        .za3r2  
%
%  PRZEDROSTKI: ZE- , ROZE- , UZE-
%
  .ze3b2    .ro3z4e3b2                    .ze3n2    .ro3z4e3n2
  .ze3c2    .ro3z4e3c2                    .ze3@n2   .ro3z4e3@n2
  .zech2    .rozech2                      .ze3p2    .ro3z4e3p2
  .zecz2    .rozecz2                      .zepch2   .rozepch2
  .ze3@c2   .ro3z4e3@c2                   .ze3r2    .ro3z4e3r2
  .ze3d2    .ro3z4e3d2                    .zerz2    .rozerz2
  .zedz2    .rozedz2                      .zer@r2   .rozer@r2
  .zed@z2   .rozed@z2                     .ze3s2    .ro3z4e3s2
  .zed@r2   .rozed@r2                     .zesch2   .rozesch2
  .ze3f2    .ro3z4e3f2                    .zesm4  
  .ze3g2    .ro3z4e3g2                    .zesz2    .rozesz2
  .ze3h2    .ro3z4e3h2                    .ze3@s2   .ro3z4e3@s2   
            .ro3z4ej                      .ze3t2    .ro3z4e3t2
  .ze3k2    .ro3z4e3k2                    .ze3tk2   
  .zekl2                                  .ze3w2    .ro3z4e3w2     .uze3w2
  .ze3l2    .ro3z4e3l2                    .ze3z2    .ro3z4e3z2
  .ze3@l2   .ro3z4e3@l2                   .ze3@z2   .ro3z4e3@z2
  .ze3m2    .ro3z4e3m2                    .ze3@r2   .ro3z4e3@r2
%
%  GRUPY SP@O@LG@LOSKOWE
%
  2j1b    2l1b    2@l1b    2m1b    2n1b    2@n1b    2r1b    2rz1b    2w1b
  2j1c    2l1c    2@l1c    2m1c    2n1c    2@n1c    2r1c    2rz1c    2w1c  
  2j1@c   2l1@c   2@l1@c   2m1@c   2n1@c   2@n1@c   2r1@c   2rz1@c   2w1@c
  2j1d    2l1d    2@l1d    2m1d    2n1d    2@n1d    2r1d    2rz1d    2w1d
  2j1f    2l1f    2@l1f    2m1f    2n1f    2@n1f    2r1f    2rz1f    2w1f
  2j1g    2l1g    2@l1g    2m1g    2n1g    2@n1g    2r1g    2rz1g    2w1g
  2j1j    2l1j    2@l1j    2m1j    2n1j    2@n1j    2r1j    2rz1j    2w1j    
  2j1k    2l1k    2@l1k    2m1k    2n1k    2@n1k    2r1k    2rz1k    2w1k
  2j1l    2l1l    2@l1l    2m1l    2n1l    2@n1l    2r1l    2rz1l    2w1l
  2j1@l   2l1@l   2@l1@l   2m1@l   2n1@l   2@n1@l   2r1@l   2rz1@l   2w1@l
  2j1m    2l1m    2@l1m    2m1m    2n1m    2@n1m    2r1m    2rz1m    2w1m
  2j1n    2l1n    2@l1n    2m1n    2n1n    2@n1n    2r1n    2rz1n    2w1n    
  2j1@n   2l1@n   2@l1@n   2m1@n   2n1@n   2@n1@n   2r1@n   2rz1@n   2w1@n
  2j1p    2l1p    2@l1p    2m1p    2n1p    2@n1p    2r1p    2rz1p    2w1p
  2j1r    2l1r    2@l1r    2m1r    2n1r    2@n1r    2r1r    2rz1r    2w1r
  2j1s    2l1s    2@l1s    2m1s    2n1s    2@n1s    2r1s    2rz1s    2w1s
  2j1@s   2l1@s   2@l1@s   2m1@s   2n1@s   2@n1@s   2r1@s   2rz1@s   2w1@s
  2j1t    2l1t    2@l1t    2m1t    2n1t    2@n1t    2r1t    2rz1t    2w1t
  2j1w    2l1w    2@l1w    2m1w    2n1w    2@n1w    2r1w    2rz1w    2w1w
  2j1z    2l1z    2@l1z    2m1z    2n1z    2@n1z                     2w1z
  2j1@z   2l1@z   2@l1@z   2m1@z   2n1@z   2@n1@z   2r1@z   2rz1@z   2w1@z
  2j1@r   2l1@r   2@l1@r   2m1@r   2n1@r   2@n1@r   2r1@r   2rz1@r   2w1@r
%
  2b1b    2d1b    2g1b     2k1b    2p1b    2t1b      
  2b1c    2d1c    2g1c     2k1c    2p1c    2t1c
  2b1@c   2d1@c   2g1@c    2k1@c   2p1@c   2t1@c
  2b1d    2d1d    2g1d     2k1d    2p1d    2t1d
  2b1f    2d1f    2g1f     2k1f    2p1f    2t1f
  2b1g    2d1g    2g1g     2k1g    2p1g    2t1g
  2b1k    2d1k    2g1k     2k1k    2p1k    2t1k
  2b1m    2d1m    2g1m     2k1m    2p1m    2t1m
  2b1n    2d1n             2k1n    2p1n    2t1n
  2b1@n   2d1@n   2g1@n    2k1@n   2p1@n   2t1@n
  2b1p    2d1p    2g1p     2k1p    2p1p    2t1p
  2b1s    2d1s    2g1s                     2t1s
                           2k1sz   2p1sz
  2b1@s   2d1@s   2g1@s    2k1@s   2p1@s   2t1@s
  2b1t    2d1t    2g1t     2k1t    2p1t    2t1t
  2b1z            2g1z     2k1z    2p1z    2t1z
  2b1@z           2g1@z    2k1@z   2p1@z   2t1@z
  2b1@r           2g1@r    2k1@r   2p1@r   2t1@r
%
  2c1b    2@c1b   2cz1b    2dz1b   2d@z1b  2d@r1b
  2c1c    2@c1c   2cz1c    2dz1c   2d@z1c  2d@r1c
  2c1@c   2@c1@c  2cz1@c   2dz1@c  2d@z1@c 2d@r1@c
  2c1d    2@c1d   2cz1d    2dz1d   2d@z1d  2d@r1d
  2c1f    2@c1f   2cz1f    2dz1f   2d@z1f  2d@r1f
  2c1g    2@c1g   2cz1g    2dz1g   2d@z1g  2d@r1g                         
                                            d@r2j
  2c1k    2@c1k   2cz1k    2dz1k   2d@z1k  2d@r1k
  2c1l     @c2l   2cz1l    2dz1l            d@r2l
                                            d@r2@l
  2c1m    2@c1m   2cz1m    2dz1m   2d@z1m  2d@r1m
  2c1n    2@c1n   2cz1n    2dz1n   2d@z1n  2d@r1n
  2c1@n   2@c1@n  2cz1@n   2dz1@n  2d@z1@n 2d@r1@n
  2c1p    2@c1p   2cz1p    2dz1p   2d@z1p  2d@r1p
                                            d@r2r
  2c1s    2@c1s   2cz1s    2dz1s   2d@z1s  2d@r1s
  2c1@s   2@c1@s  2cz1@s   2dz1@s  2d@z1@s 2d@r1@s
  2c1t    2@c1t   2cz1t    2dz1t   2d@z1t  2d@r1t
                                            d@r2w   
          2@c1z   2cz1z    2dz1z   2d@z1z  2d@r1z
  2c1@z   2@c1@z  2cz1@z   2dz1@z  2d@z1@z 2d@r1@z
  2c1@r   2@c1@r  2cz1@r   2dz1@r  2d@z1@r 2d@r1@r
%
  2ch1b   2h1b    2@r1b            2s1b    2@s1b            2@z1b 
  2ch1c   2h1c    2@r1c     sz2c            @s1c    2z1c    2@z1c 
                                           1@s2ci   
  2ch1@c  2h1@c   2@r1@c    sz2@c                   2z1@c   2@z1@c
  2ch1d   2h1d    2@r1d            2s1d    2@s1d            2@z1d  
  2ch1f   2h1f    2@r1f     sz2f           2@s1f    2z1f    2@z1f 
  2ch1g   2h1g    2@r1g            2s1g    2@s1g            2@z1g       
          2h1h                                          
   ch2j   2h1j    2@r1j                                 
  2ch1k   2h1k    2@r1k     sz2k           2@s1k    2z1k    2@z1k  
   ch2l   2h1l    2@r1l                                 
   ch2@l  2h1@l   2@r1@l                                 
  2ch1m   2h1m    2@r1m                                 
  2ch1n   2h1n    2@r1n                                 
  2ch1@n  2h1@n   2@r1@n                                 
  2ch1p   2h1p    2@r1p     sz2p           2@s1p    2z1p    2@z1p 
   ch2r   2h1r    2@r1r                                 
  2ch1s   2h1s    2@r1s     sz2s   2s1s    2@s1s    2z1s    2@z1s
  2ch1@s  2h1@s   2@r1@s    sz2@s          2@s1@s   2z1@s   2@z1@s
  2ch1t   2h1t    2@r1t     sz2t           2@s1t    2z1t    2@z1t  
   ch2w   2h1w    2@r1w                                 
  2ch1z   2h1z    2@r1z     sz2z           2@s1z    2z1z    2@z1z      
  2ch1@z  2h1@z   2@r1@z           2s1@z   2@s1@z           2@z1@z
  2ch1@r  2h1@r   2@r1@r           2s1@r   2@s1@r           2@z1@r 
                                                             @z2d@z
%
  2f1f     2f1n
%
%  R@O@RNE  
%
  3d2ni    3m2ni    2p1sk  2p1stw
%
  .do4k3t       .dy3s4ta      .is3lam     ma2r6z@l.       .po4r3tr   
  .do4l3n       .fi2l3h       ma2r5zn     na2d5z2wyczaj   turboo2d3rzut   
  .do4w3c       .fi2s3harm    ma2r5zl     nie4m3cz        .ro2k3rocz    
  .du2sz3past   .fi2sz3bin    ma2r5z@l    .po4l3s         .sy2n3opt   
%
  2ch3kolwiek.     2m3kolwiek.     2@s3kolwiek.
%
%  GRUPY SP@O@LG@LOSKOWE NA KO@NCU WYRAZ@OW
%
  4ch@l.      4k@l.       4rz@l.      4stw.       4@sl.       4trz.    
  4d@l.       4kst.       4s@l.       4szt.       4@sm.       4z@l.    
  4d@z.       4prz.       4str.       4szcz.      4@s@n.      4@z@n.   
  4g@l.       4rsz.       4strz.      4@s@c.      4t@l.    
}
 
\hyphenation{    %  WYJ@ATKI
  be-zami     be-zach     by-naj-mniej   ina-czej         ni-gdzie
  p@o-@lach   p@o-@lami   p@o-@lek       przy-naj-mniej   sk@ad-in@ad  
  sk@ad-@re   tr@o-jach   tr@o-jami      tr@o-jek}
